Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.040

Licensing exemptions.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit:

(1) Service in the case of emergency;

(2) The domestic administration of family remedies;

(3) The practice of midwifery as permitted under chapter 18.50 RCW;

(4) The practice of osteopathic medicine and surgery by any commissioned medical officer in the United States government or military service or by any osteopathic physician and surgeon employed by a federal agency, in the discharge of his or her official duties;

(5) Practice by a dentist licensed under chapter 18.32 RCW when engaged exclusively in the practice of dentistry;

(6) The consultation through telemedicine or other means by a practitioner, licensed by another state or territory in which he or she resides, with a practitioner licensed in this state who has responsibility for the diagnosis and treatment of the patient within this state;

(7) In-person practice by any osteopathic physician and surgeon from any other state or territory in which he or she resides: PROVIDED, That such practitioner shall not open an office or appoint a place of meeting patients or receive calls within the limits of this state;

(8) Practice by a person who is a student enrolled in an accredited school of osteopathic medicine and surgery approved by the board if:

(a) The performance of such services is only pursuant to a course of instruction or assignments from his or her instructor or school, and such services are performed only under the supervision of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or

(b)(i) Such services are performed without compensation or expectation of compensation as part of a volunteer activity;

(ii) The student is under the direct supervision and control of a pharmacist licensed under chapter 18.64 RCW, a physician licensed under chapter 18.71 RCW, an osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter, or a registered nurse or *advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW;

(iii) The services the student performs are within the scope of practice of: (A) An osteopathic physician and surgeon licensed under this chapter; and (B) the person supervising the student;

(iv) The school in which the student is enrolled verifies the student has demonstrated competency through his or her education and training to perform the services; and

(v) The student provides proof of current malpractice insurance to the volunteer activity organizer prior to performing any services;

(9) Practice by an osteopathic physician and surgeon serving a period of clinical postgraduate medical training in a postgraduate program approved by the board: PROVIDED, That the performance of such services be only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program, and said services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW; or

(10) Practice by a person who is enrolled in a physician assistant program approved by the board who is performing such services only pursuant to a course of instruction in said program: PROVIDED, That such services are performed only under the supervision and control of a person licensed pursuant to this chapter or chapter 18.71 RCW.

This chapter shall not be construed to apply in any manner to any other system or method of treating the sick or afflicted or to apply to or interfere in any way with the practice of religion or any kind of treatment by prayer.

[2021 c 247 s 2; 2019 c 270 s 2; 1991 c 160 s 5; 1919 c 4 s 19; RRS s 10071. FORMER PART OF SECTION: 1921 c 82 s 1, part; 1919 c 4 s 17, part; RRS s 10069, part, now codified in RCW 18.57.130.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The term "advanced registered nurse practitioner" was changed to "advanced practice registered nurse" by 2024 c 239 s 1, effective June 30, 2027.

Midwifery: Chapter 18.50 RCW.